Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-645
Licensees; exempt from Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act.

Any county, city, or village licensed to conduct a lottery pursuant to the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act shall be exempt from the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act solely with respect to unclaimed lottery prizes.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 85.

Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act, see section 69-1329.